particles/interj.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Interjections
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Interj

LEXICON Root
allo	INTERJ;
au		INTERJ;
bah		INTERJ;
brr		INTERJ;
chau	INTERJ;
cucu	INTERJ;
davent	INTERJ;
ebain	INTERJ;
enturn	INTERJ;
halt	INTERJ;
he		INTERJ;
hm		INTERJ;
hopla	INTERJ;
juhui	INTERJ;
merda	INTERJ;
miau	INTERJ;
muh		INTERJ;
oh		INTERJ;
oha		INTERJ;
peng	INTERJ;
pst		INTERJ;
pumf	INTERJ;
pumfata	INTERJ;
si		INTERJ;
uschia	INTERJ;
vinavant	INTERJ;

LEXICON INTERJ
+Interj:0	#;
